Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 31-25-1.
Short title.

This act may be referred to and cited as the “Mississippi Development Bank Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-3.
Legislative intent; construction.

It is hereby determined and declared to be the policy of the state that, for the benefit of the people of the State of Mississippi, it is essential to foster and promote by all reasonable means the provision of adequate access to capital markets and facilities for borrowing money to finance infrastructure improvements and other public purposes from the proceeds of bonds and to the extent possible to reduce costs of indebtedness to taxpayers and residents of the state through the encouragement of investor interest in the purchase of such bonds as sound and preferred securities for investment. It is further found and declared that the state should exercise its powers to further and implement these policies by authorizing an independent public body to be created and to have full power to borrow money and to issue its bonds and notes to make funds available at reduced rates and on more favorable terms for borrowing as provided in this act. This act shall be liberally construed to accomplish the intentions, purposes and objects expressed herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-5.
Definitions.

As used in this act, the following words and terms have the following meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Act” means this Mississippi Development Bank Act.

“Bank” means the Mississippi Development Bank created by this act.

“Board” means the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation.

“Bondholder” or “holder” or any similar term when used with reference to a bond of the bank means any person who shall be the bearer of any outstanding bond of the bank registered to bearer or not registered, or the registered owner of any outstanding bond of the bank which shall at the time be registered other than to bearer.

“Bonds” means bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the bank issued pursuant to this act.

“County” shall mean a county of this state.

“Fully marketable form” means a duly and validly issued security accompanied by an approving legal opinion of a bond counsel of recognized standing in the field of bond law whose opinions are generally accepted by purchasers of municipal bonds, provided that the security so executed need not be printed or lithographed nor be in more than one (1) denomination.

“Local governmental unit” means (i) any county, municipality, utility district, regional solid waste authority, county cooperative service district or political subdivision of the State of Mississippi, (ii) the State of Mississippi or any agency thereof, (iii) the institutions of higher learning of the State of Mississippi, (iv) any education building corporation established for institutions of higher learning, or (v) any other governmental unit created under state law.

“Municipality” means any municipality of the state, whether operating under the code charter, the commission form of government, a special charter or any other form of government.

“Security” means a bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness issued by a local governmental unit pursuant to the provisions of this act.

“Revenues” means all fees, charges, monies, profits, payments of principal of or interest on securities and other investments, gifts, grants, contributions, appropriations and all other income derived by the bank under this act.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 578, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 481 § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 537, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 2000).

§ 31-25-7.
Mississippi Development Bank created.

There is hereby created an independent public body corporate and politic to be known as the Mississippi Development Bank. Such bank is created solely to accomplish the purposes of the state under this chapter and the exercise by the bank of the powers conferred by this act shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential public function.

The bank and its corporate existence shall continue until terminated by law; provided, however, that no such law shall take effect so long as the bank shall have bonds or other obligations outstanding, unless provision has been made for the full and complete payment thereof. Upon termination of the existence of the bank, all its rights and properties shall pass to and be vested in the state. No net earnings of the bank may inure to the benefit of any person, entity or bank other than the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 481 § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1992).

§ 31-25-9.
Bank’s powers vested in board.

The powers conferred upon the bank hereby are to be vested in the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 5; Laws, 1992, ch. 481 § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1992).

§ 31-25-11.
Quorum for conducting business; per diem compensation; expenses.

A majority of the voting members of the board then in office shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising its powers. Action may be taken and motions and resolutions adopted by the board upon the affirmative vote of a majority of its members present at any meeting at which a quorum was present. No vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the bank. Notice of meetings shall be given in the manner provided in the bylaws of the bank. Resolutions need not be published or posted. Members of the board shall receive per diem compensation for services in an amount as provided under Section 25-3-69 and shall be entitled to expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties in accordance with Section 25-3-41. Any payments for compensation and expenses shall be paid from funds of the bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 481, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1992).

§31-25-13. [Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986)]

§ 31-25-15.
Disclosure of contractual interest.

Any member, officer or employee of the bank who is interested either directly or indirectly, or who is an officer or employee of, or has an ownership interest in any firm or agency interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract with the bank, shall disclose this interest to the board. This interest shall be set forth in the minutes of the board, and the member, officer or employee having the interest shall not participate on behalf of the bank in the authorization of any such contract.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-17.
Acceptance of membership on bank; nonforfeiture of office or employment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, no officer or employee of this state shall be deemed to have forfeited or shall forfeit his office or employment by reason of his acceptance of membership on the bank or his services as such member.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-19.
Powers and duties of Bank.

In addition to the other powers granted to the bank under this act, the bank shall have the power:

To sue and be sued in its own name;

To have an official seal and to alter the same at pleasure;

To maintain an office at such place or places within this state as it may designate, by lease without the approval of any other state agency or department;

To adopt and, from time to time, to amend and repeal bylaws and rules and regulations, not inconsistent with this act, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the bank and governing the conduct of its affairs and business and the use of its services and facilities;

To make, enter into and enforce all contracts or agreements necessary, convenient or desirable for the purposes of the bank or pertaining to any loan to a local governmental unit made by the purchase of municipal securities or to the performance of its duties and execution or carrying out of any of its other powers under this act;

To acquire, hold, use and dispose of its income, revenues, funds and monies;

To the extent that it will facilitate the conduct of its operations and thereby further the purposes of this act, to acquire real or other personal property, or any interest therein, on either a temporary or long-term basis in the name of the bank by gift, purchase, transfer, foreclosure, lease or otherwise, including rights or easements, hold, sell, assign, lease, encumber mortgage or otherwise dispose of any real or other personal property, or any interest therein or mortgage interest owned by it or under its control, custody or in its possession and release or relinquish any right, title, claim, lien, interest, easement or demand however acquired, including any equity or right of redemption in property foreclosed by it and to do any of the foregoing by public or private sale; and, to the same extent, to lease or rent any lands, buildings, structures, facilities or equipment from private parties;

To enter into agreements or other transactions with and accept the cooperation of the United States or any agency thereof or of the state or any agency or governmental subdivision thereof (including any local governmental unit whether or not such local governmental unit is selling or has sold its bonds to the bank) in furtherance of the purposes of this act and the corporate purposes of the bank, and to do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such cooperation;

To receive and accept grants, aid or contributions, including loan guarantees, from any source of money, materials, property, labor, supplies, services, program or other things of value, to be held, used and applied to carry out the purposes of this act subject to such conditions upon which such grants and contributions, including loan guarantees, may be made, including, but not limited to, gifts or grants, including loan guarantees, from any department or agency of the United States or of this state or of any governmental subdivision of this state (including any local governmental unit whether or not such local governmental unit is selling or has sold its bonds to the bank) for any purpose consistent with this act, and to do any and all things necessary, useful, desirable or convenient in connection with the procurement acceptance or disposition of such gifts or grants, including loan guarantees;

To procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets in such amounts and from insurers as it deems desirable, and to obtain from any department or agency of the United States of America or nongovernmental insurer any insurance or guaranty, to the extent now or hereafter available, as to, or of or for the payment or repayment of interest, principal or redemption price, if any, or all or any part thereof, on any bonds issued by the bank, or on any municipal securities of local governmental units purchased or held by the bank pursuant to this act; and notwithstanding any other provisions of this act to the contrary, to enter into any agreement or contract whatsoever with respect to any such insurance or guaranty, except to the extent that the same would in any way impair or interfere with the ability of the bank to perform and fulfill the terms of any agreement made with the holders of the bonds of the bank;

To employ administrative and clerical staff, managing agents, architects, engineers, attorneys, accountants, and financial advisors and experts and such other advisors, consultants, agents and employees as may be necessary in its judgment and to fix their compensation, and to perform its powers or functions through its officers, agents and employees or by contracts with any firm, person or corporation;

To the extent permitted under its contract with the holders of bonds of the bank, to consent to any modification of the rate of interest, time and payment of any installment of principal or interest, security or any other term of such bond, contract or agreement of any kind to which the bank is a party;

To purchase, hold or dispose of any of its bonds;

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to invest any funds or monies of the bank or proceeds of any securities or certificates of participation in such manner as shall be deemed by the bank to be prudent except as otherwise permitted or provided by this act;

To conduct examinations and hearings and to hear testimony and take proof, under oath or affirmation, at public or private hearings, on any matter material for its information and necessary to carry out this act;

To loan money to local governmental units by the purchase of municipal securities, subject to the provisions of this act;

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes and to issue bonds therefor, subject to the provisions of this act;

To exercise any and all of the powers granted to the bank by any other section of this act and to do any act necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers herein granted or reasonably implied therefrom;

To loan money to any local governmental unit under any loan guaranty program of any department or agency of the United States, including the United States Department of Agriculture Rural Utility Services Water and Waste Disposal Guaranteed Loan Program and Community Programs Guaranteed Loan Program or any such successor guaranty programs; and

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to contract with any local governmental unit for the exercise by the bank of any and all of the bank’s powers as set out in this act, with respect to proceeds of such local governmental unit’s securities or certificates of participation issued by such local governmental unit pursuant to any state law authorizing the issuance of local governmental unit debt.

Paragraphs (s) and (t) of subsection (1) of this section shall be deemed to provide all necessary authority for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes and the authorizations therein stated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 10; Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 26; Laws, 2003, ch. 328, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 7, 2003).

§ 31-25-20.
Power of bank to loan money to local governmental unit.

In addition to the other powers granted to the bank under this section, the bank shall have the powers:

To make, enter into and enforce all contracts or agreements necessary, convenient or pertaining to any loan to a local governmental unit under this section;

To loan money to local governmental units for any of the purposes set forth in this section;

To charge for its costs and services in reviewing or considering any proposed loan to a local governmental unit and such costs may be established in such manner as the bank shall determine;

To fix and prescribe any form of application or procedure to be required of a local governmental unit for the purpose of any loan to be made to such governmental unit and to fix the terms and conditions of any such loan;

To issue revenue bonds to fund loans to local governmental units for the acquisition, construction and installation of energy related improvements, and other related or similar infrastructure improvements consistent with the intentions, purposes and objects of this section. Before any bonds may be issued for this purpose, the requirements of Section 31-25-28(6) must be satisfied; and

To issue revenue bonds to fund or assist in funding retirement systems established pursuant to Sections 21-29-201 through 21-29-261. Before any revenue bonds may be issued for this purpose, the municipality whose retirement system is being funded by such bonds shall have an actuary perform a study through the Public Employees’ Retirement System to determine the effect of such revenue bonds on such retirement system.

To issue bonds in the amount of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) to provide additional funding for the grant program authorized under Section 18 of Chapter 530, Laws of 1995, which provided funds to counties and municipalities for the construction, renovation and expansion of livestock facilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 470, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1996).

§ 31-25-21.
Power of bank to loan money to local governmental unit.

The bank is hereby granted, has and may exercise the power to borrow money and issue its bonds in such principal amounts as it shall deem necessary to provide funds to accomplish a public purpose or purposes of the state provided for under this chapter, including:

The making of loans to local governmental units by the purchase of municipal securities thereof;

The payment, funding, refunding of the principal of, or interest or redemption premiums on, any bonds issued by it whether the bonds have or have not become due or subject to redemption in accordance with their terms;

The establishment or increase of such debt service reserves and capitalized interest accounts to pay bonds or interest thereon as the bank shall consider necessary or advisable in the marketing of such bonds;

The payment of consultant and legal fees and such other costs of issuance and expenses necessary or incidental to such bond issue;

The deposit of funds into reserve funds established by the bank;

The establishment or increase of reserves to pay all other costs and expenses of the bank incident to and necessary or convenient to carrying out its corporate purposes and powers;

The deposit of funds into the Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund and the Water Pollution Control Emergency Loan Fund created pursuant to Sections 49-17-81 through 49-17-89;

The issuance of up to Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) in revenue bonds for regional solid waste authorities and county cooperative service districts;

The advance purchase of energy for any municipality that operates a gas producing, generating, transmission or distribution system, or an electric generating, transmission or distribution system under Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-71;

The issuance of revenue bonds to fund or assist in funding retirement systems established pursuant to Sections 21-29-1 through 21-29-55 and Sections 21-29-101 through 21-29-151. Before any revenue bonds may be issued for this purpose the municipality whose retirement system is being funded by such bonds shall have an actuary perform a study through the Public Employees’ Retirement System to determine the amount of revenue bonds that should be issued to make such retirement system actuarially sound;

To issue general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi for the purposes provided in Section 31-25-20(g), as such section existed on April 3, 1996. The authority to issue such general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi shall be repealed from and after the date that the bonds have been issued in their entirety;

The issuance of bonds to fund loans made by the bank to any local governmental unit under any loan guaranty program of any department or agency of the United States, including the United States Department of Agriculture Rural Utility Services Water and Waste Disposal Guaranteed Loan Program and Community Programs Guaranteed Loan Program or any such successor guaranty programs.

Any other lawful, corporate purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 11; Laws, 1989, ch. 522, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 481 § 4; Laws, 1994, ch. 547, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 548, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 455, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 302, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 328, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 7, 2003).

§ 31-25-23.
Loans to local governmental units; purchase or sale of municipal securities.

The bank is hereby granted, has and may exercise, the following powers:

To make loans to local governmental units by the purchase and holding of municipal securities in such form (including fully remarketable form), at such prices, in such manner, on such terms and conditions and with such security features as the bank shall deem advisable subject to the provisions of Section 31-25-27;

Subject to the terms of contracts with the holders of bonds of the bank, to sell municipal securities acquired or held by it at such prices without relation to costs and in such manner as the bank shall deem desirable;

To charge for its costs and services in reviewing or considering any proposed loan to a local governmental unit by the purchase of municipal securities of such local governmental unit, and to charge therefor, whether or not such municipal securities are purchased, and such costs may be established in such manner as the bank shall determine, including but not limited to an allocation to each local governmental unit using the services of the bank of an equitable portion of the total administrative expenses of the bank, which expenses shall include the fees and expenses of trustees and paying agents for bonds of the bank, as it shall deem appropriate;

In connection with any loan to a local governmental unit, to consider the need, desirability or eligibility of the loan, the ability of the local governmental unit to secure borrowed money from other sources and the costs thereof, the particular local improvements or purposes to be financed by the municipal securities to be purchased by the bank, the ability of the municipality to supply other essential public improvements and services and to pay punctually the principal and interest on its debts, the reasonableness of the amounts to be expended for each of the purposes or improvements to be financed pursuant to such bonds, and such other factors as the bank may deem necessary;

To establish any terms and provisions with respect to any purchase of municipal securities by the bank, including date and maturities of the bonds, provisions as to redemption or payment prior to maturity, and any other matters which are necessary, desirable or advisable in the judgment of the bank, subject to the provisions of Section 31-25-27;

To fix and prescribe any form of application or procedure to be required of a local governmental unit for the purpose of any loan to be made to such governmental unit by the purchase of its municipal securities, and to fix the terms and conditions of any such loan and to enter into agreements with local governmental units with respect to any such loan;

In order to assure the continued creditworthiness and fiscal stability of the local governmental units to which the bank shall make loans by the purchase of municipal securities thereof, the board may adopt, modify or amend rules and regulations of the bank which shall provide for all or certain of the following:

Accounting systems and financial reporting standards for such local governmental units which will provide a uniform basis from which financial data may be obtained by the bank and furnished to investors;

Standards for debt management and budget procedures and practices;

Procedures relating to internal controls over the receipt, deposit, investment, transfer and disbursement of funds of such local governmental units so as to assure the proper application thereof;

Requirements for financial and economic feasibility studies or other studies or surveys with respect to revenue-producing enterprises or systems of such local governmental units or the management thereof or the rates, charges, rents or tolls for the use or service thereof; and

Other matters relating to the fiscal stability and creditworthiness of such local governmental units.

Compliance with such rules and regulations of the bank may be required for local governmental units receiving financing from the bank, subject to such terms, conditions and exceptions as the board may from time to time determine to be practicable and to be necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-25.
Prohibited transactions.

Under this act the bank may not:

Make loans of money to any person, firm or corporation or purchase securities issued by any person, firm or corporation other than a local governmental unit for investment;

Emit bills of credit, or accept deposits of money for time or demand deposit, or administer trusts, or engage in any form or manner in, or in the conduct of, any private or commercial banking business, or act as a savings bank or savings and loan association;

Be or constitute a bank or trust company within the jurisdiction or under the control of any official of the state or the United States regulating such institutions; or

Be or constitute a banker, broker or dealer in securities within the meaning of or subject to the provisions of any securities, securities exchange, or securities dealers law, of the United States of America or of the state or of any other state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).